Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1490
Principal or lobbyist; prohibited acts relating to gifts; penalty.

(1) No principal, lobbyist, or person acting on behalf of either shall within one calendar month give any gifts with an aggregate value of more than fifty dollars to the following:

(a) An official or a member of the official's staff in the executive branch of state government;

(b) An official or a member of the official's staff in the legislative branch of state government; or

(c) A member of the immediate family of an official in the executive or legislative branch of state government.

(2) No official or member of the official's staff in the executive or legislative branch of state government or member of the official's immediate family shall within one calendar month accept from a principal, lobbyist, or person acting on behalf of either any gifts with an aggregate value of more than fifty dollars.

(3) An admission to a state-owned facility or a state-sponsored industry or event may be given by any sponsoring agency, political subdivision, or publicly funded postsecondary educational institution and accepted regardless of value.

(4) Any person who knowingly and intentionally violates this section shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 90;

Laws 1977, LB 41, § 53;

Laws 1979, LB 162, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 134, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 1174, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 232, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 1021, § 6.